Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
196

[ENERGY
RESOURCES]

Part I. General Provisions

Section

196-1 Findings and declaration of necessity

196-1.5 Priority permitting process for renewable
energy

projects

196-2 Definitions

196-3 Energy resources coordinator

196-4 Powers and duties

196-5 Gas appliances with pilot light
prohibited; exemptions

196-6 Energy efficient storage hot water heaters

196-6.5 Solar water heater system required for new

single-family residential construction

196-7 Placement of solar energy devices

196-7.5 Placement of electric vehicle charging
system

196-8 Repealed

196-8.5 Placement of clotheslines

196-9 Energy efficiency and environmental
standards for

state facilities, motor vehicles, and
transportation

fuel

196-10 Hawaii renewable hydrogen program

196-10.5 Hawaii clean energy initiative program

Part II. Energy Efficiency in State
Facilities

196-11 Definitions

196-12 to 18 Repealed

196-19 Life-cycle cost analysis

196-20 Repealed

196-21 Financing mechanisms

196-22 State energy projects

196-23 Energy efficient products

196-24 to 29 Repealed

196-30 Public buildings; benchmarks;
retro-commissioning

guidelines; energy savings performance
contracts

Part III. Other Provisions

196-41 State support for achieving renewable
portfolio

standards

196-42 State support for achieving alternate
fuels standards

Part IV. Green Infrastructure Loans

196-61 Definitions

196-62 Hawaii green infrastructure loan program

196-63 Hawaii green infrastructure authority

196-64 Functions, powers, and duties of the
authority

196-65 Hawaii green infrastructure special fund

196-66 Use of Hawaii green infrastructure special
fund;

application

196-67 Hawaii green infrastructure bond fund

196-68 Compliance with revenue bond law

196-69 Reporting; annual report

196-70 Severability

Note

L 2014, c 218, §8 purports to amend this chapter.

Cross References

Environmental courts, jurisdiction over proceedings arising
under this chapter, see §604A-2.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next